North Dakota, session 69, HB1469.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-09-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
16.1-09-02. Statement of interests to be filed.
1. Every candidate for elective office shall sign and file the statement of interests as required by
this chapter. In a year when a president and vice president of the United States are to be
chosen, presidential and vice presidential candidates shall file with the secretary of state either
a statement of interests as required by this chapter or a copy of the personal disclosure
statement that is required by the federal election commission. Candidates for elective office
who are required to file suchthe statements shall do sofile the statements with the filing officer
for that election at the time of filing a certificate of nomination, a certificate of endorsement, a
petition of nomination, or a certificate of write-in candidacy, pursuant to chapter 16.1-11,
16.1-12, or 40-21, as is appropriate.
2. An individual who has filed a statement as the result of candidacy in a primary election need
not refile before running in the following general election. A write-in candidate who is not
required to file a certificate of write-in candidacy shall file the statement of interests after the
candidate's election at the time of filing the required oath of office. Every individual who is
appointed by the governor to a state agency, board, bureau, commission, department, or
occupational or professional licensing board shall file a statement of interests as required by
this chapter with the secretary of state simultaneously with announcement of the appointment.
3. A filing officer may not include a candidate's name on the ballot if an error is discovered on the
statement and the candidate is unable to or refuses to make the necessary correction before
the sixty-fourth day before the election.
4. While holding office, an individual required to file the statement of interests under this section,
except candidates elected to hold federal office, shall submit an annual statement of interests
to the appropriate filing officer by January thirty - first. A filing officer shall collect fees for late
filings pursuant to section 16.1 - 08.1 - 06.1 .
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-09-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
16.1-09-03. Contents of statement of interests.
The statement of interests required to be filed under this chapter applies to the candidate or
appointee and that person's spouse and must include:
1. The name of the business or employer and an identification of the principal source of income,
defined in the state income tax return as "principal occupation", of both the candidate or
appointee and that person's spouse.

H. B. NO. 1469 - PAGE 2
2. The name of each business or trust, not the principal source of income, in which the person
making the statement, and that person's spouse, have a financial interest.
3. A list of the associations or institutions with which the person making the statement, and that
person's spouse, are closely associated, or for which they serve as a director or officer, and
which may be affected by legislative action, in the case of a statement submitted by a
legislative candidate, or action by the candidate or appointee in that person's capacity as an
officeholder.
4. The identity by name of all business offices, business directorships, and fiduciary relationships
the person making the statement, and that person's spouse, have held in the preceding
calendar year.
5. A list of political subdivisions and any agency or department of the state to which the person
providing the statement, or the person's spouse, sold goods or services of more than five
thousand dollars in the preceding calendar year from:
a. An employer identified under subsection 1 in which the person or the person's spouse
has an ownership interest of ten percent or more; or
b. A business or trust identified in subsection 2 in which the person or the person's spouse
has an ownership interest of ten percent or more and the business or trust is directly
related to the official duties of the office the person is seeking or holding.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-09-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
16.1-09-05. Powers and duties of the secretary of state and county and city auditors.
The secretary of state, or the county or city auditor, when appropriate shall:
1. Accept and file any statement submitted pursuant to this chapter.
2. Make statements filed available for public inspection and copying during regular office hours. A
reasonable fee may be charged to cover the cost of copying. Proceeds from any fees charged
must be deposited in the general fund of the appropriate governmental entity.
3. Publish all statements filed with the secretary of state under this chapter on a website
maintained by the secretary of state.
4. Preserve statements filed under this chapter for the term of office to which the person making
disclosure is elected or appointed or until a new statement is filed and preserve. Preserve
statements filed pursuant tounder this chapter by those candidates who are not elected or
appointed for a period of one year after the date of receipt.

H. B. NO. 1469 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1469.
House Vote: Yeas 75 Nays 17 Absent 2
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State